Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-103 Definitions. (a) For the
purposes of this article:

"Ancillary state" means any state
other than a domiciliary state.

"Creditor" means a person having any
claim, whether matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or
unsecured, absolute, fixed, or contingent.

"Delinquency proceeding" means any
proceeding instituted against an insurer for the purpose of liquidating,
rehabilitating, reorganizing, or conserving such insurer, and any summary
proceeding under section 431:15-201 or 431:15-202.

"Doing business" means transacting
the business of insurance as defined in section 431:1-215, or operating,
whether by mail or otherwise, as an insurer under a license or certificate of
authority issued by the insurance division.

"Domiciliary state" means the state
in which an insurer is incorporated or organized, or, in the case of an alien
insurer, its state of entry.

"Fair consideration" means
consideration given for property or obligation:

(1) When in exchange for such property or obligation,
as a fair equivalent therefor, and in good faith, property is conveyed or
services are rendered or an obligation is incurred or an antecedent debt is
satisfied; or

(2) When such property or obligation is received in
good faith to secure a present advance or antecedent debt in an amount not
disproportionately small as compared to the value of the property or obligation
obtained.

"Foreign country" means any other
jurisdiction not in any state.

"Formal delinquency proceeding" means
any liquidation or rehabilitation proceeding.

"General assets" means all property,
real, personal, or otherwise, not specifically mortgaged, pledged, deposited,
or otherwise encumbered for the security or benefit of specified persons or
classes of persons. As to specifically encumbered property, general assets
includes all such property or its proceeds in excess of the amount necessary to
discharge the sum or sums secured. Assets held in trust and on deposit for the
security or benefit of all policyholders or all policyholders and creditors, in
more than a single state, shall be treated as general assets.

"Guaranty association" means the
Hawaii insurance guaranty association created by part I of article 16, the
Hawaii life and disability insurance association created by part II of article
16, and any other similar entity now or hereafter created by the legislature of
this State for the payment of claims of insolvent insurers. Foreign guaranty
association means any similar entities created by the legislature of any other
state.

"Insolvency" or "insolvent"
means:

(1) For an insurer issuing only assessable fire
insurance policies:

(A) The inability to pay any obligation
within thirty days after it becomes payable; or

(B) If an assessment be made within thirty
days after such date, the inability to pay such obligation thirty days
following the date specified in the first assessment notice issued after the
date of loss pursuant to this code;

(2) For any other insurer, that it is unable to pay
its obligations when they are due, or when its admitted assets do not exceed
its liabilities plus the greater of:

(A) Any capital and surplus required by law
for its organization; or

(B) The total par or stated value of its
authorized and issued capital stock; and

(3) As to any insurer licensed to do
business in this State as of July 1, 1988, who does not meet the standard
established under subparagraph (B), the term insolvency or insolvent shall
mean, for a period not to exceed three years from July 1, 1988, that it is
unable to pay its obligations when they are due or that its admitted assets do
not exceed its liabilities plus any required capital contribution ordered by
the commissioner under provisions of this code.

"Insurer" means any person who has
done, purports to do, is doing or is licensed to do an insurance business, and
is or has been subject to the authority of, or to liquidation, rehabilitation,
reorganization, supervision, or conservation by any insurance commissioner.
For purposes of this article, any other persons included under section
431:15-102 shall be deemed to be insurers.

"Liabilities" include but are not
limited to reserves required by statute, insurance division rules, or specific
requirements imposed by the commissioner upon a subject company at the time of
admission or subsequent thereto.

"Preferred claim" means any claim
with respect to which the terms of this article accord priority of payment from
the general assets of the insurer.

"Receiver" means receiver,
liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator as the context requires.

"Reciprocal state" means any state
other than this State in which in substance and effect sections 431:15-307(a),
431:15-403, 431:15-404, and 431:15-406 through 431:15-408 are in force, and in
which provisions are in force requiring the commissioner or equivalent official
be the receiver of a delinquent insurer, and in which some provision exists for
the avoidance of fraudulent conveyances and preferential transfers.

"Secured claim" means any claim
secured by mortgage, trust deed, pledge, deposit as security, escrow, or
otherwise, but not including special deposit claims or claims against general
assets. The term also includes claims that have become liens upon specific
assets by reason of judicial process.

"Secured deposit claim" means any
claim secured by a deposit made pursuant to statute for the security or benefit
of a limited class or classes of persons, but not including any claim secured
by general assets.

"State" means any state, district, or
territory of the United States and the Panama Canal Zone.

"Transfer" means every method, direct
or indirect, of disposing of property, of an interest in property, of the
possession of property, of fixing a lien upon property, or upon an interest in
property, absolutely or conditionally, voluntarily or involuntarily, by or
without judicial proceedings. The retention of a security interest in or title
to property delivered to a debtor is considered a transfer by the debtor.

(b) If the subject of a rehabilitation or
liquidation proceeding under this article is an insurer engaged in a surety
business, then as used in this article:

(1) Policy includes a bond issued by a surety;

(2) Policyholder includes a principal on a bond;

(3) Beneficiary includes an obligee of a bond; and

(4) Insured includes both the principal and obligee
of a bond. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 121, §1; am L 2004, c 122,
§66]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next